Tennessee, session 114, SB0756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-809(a), is amended by deleting
the language "or sheriff's deputy" and substituting instead the language "sheriff's deputy, or
campus police officer".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-809(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) This section is repealed on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0756
002397
- 1 -